Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska44-2855
Act, how cited.

Sections 44-2801 to 44-2855 shall be known and may be cited as the Nebraska Hospital-Medical Liability Act.

Laws 1976, LB 434, § 56;

Laws 1984, LB 692, § 20;

Laws 1990, LB 542, § 5;

Laws 2004, LB 998, § 9.